Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Removing Barriers to Jury Service is established.
(2) The task force consists of 15 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from among  members of the
Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of  Representatives shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint five representatives as follows:
(A) One member representing district attorneys;
(B) One member representing attorneys who provide legal  defense in criminal pro-
ceedings;
(C) One representative of an association representing businesses;
(D) One member of the Racial Justice Council established in ORS 176.350; and
(E) One representative of the Association of Oregon Counties.
(d) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint five members as follows:
(A) Two judges with experience presiding over criminal or civil jury trials;
(B) One attorney with experience with civil jury trials  or a representative from an or-
ganization representing civil litigation attorneys;
(C) One justice  of the peace or municipal court judge with experience presiding over
criminal or civil jury trials; and
(D) One representative of the Oregon State Bar.
(e) The Chief Justice, or the Chief Justice’s designee, shall be chairperson of the  task
force and shall act as a nonvoting member of the task force.
(3) In evaluating members for appointment, the appointing authority shall consider the
need for diverse task force  membership in the areas of gender, race and ethnicity, ge-
ography, age, disability and lived experience as a juror or participant in jury trials.
(4) The task force shall:
(a) Examine this state’s current structure of  jury compensation and resulting partic-
ipation levels and how  this state’s structure and participation levels compare to the struc-
ture and participation levels in other states;
(b) Propose recommendations  to modify this state’s structure of jury compensation to
improve jury participation levels;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1175 (SB 1175-A) Page 1
(c) Recommend public outreach and education strategies  that will inform the public re-
garding jury compensation and participation; and
(d) Examine and propose  recommendations to address additional barriers to jury service.
(5) A majority of the voting members of the task force constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of  the voting
members of the task force.
(7) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) The task force shall submit a report in the manner  provided by ORS 192.245, and
may include recommendations  for legislation, to the Chief Justice, the Governor and the in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to  the judiciary no later than Decem-
ber 15,  2026. The final report may include any minority and dissenting views, opinions or
recommendations either as part of the report or attached as a separate report.
(11) The Judicial Department shall provide staff support to the task force.
(12) The task force may consult with local  or national experts on issues relating to jury
improvement.
(13) Members  of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the task force are nonvoting
members of the task force and may act in an advisory capacity only.
(14) Members of the task force who are not members of the  Legislative Assembly are not
entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses and serve as volunteers on  the task
force.
(15) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on December 31, 2026.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1175 (SB 1175-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate April 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1175 (SB 1175-A) Page 3